Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.107

Surety bond—Liability limited.

(1) Except under RCW 19.72.109, surety bond means any form of surety insurance as defined in RCW 48.11.080. A surety bond may not provide any other type of insurance coverage defined in chapter 48.11 RCW. Language in any statute, ordinance, contract, or surety bond to the contrary is void.

(2) A surety bond shall not be liable for damages based upon or arising out of any:

(a) Tortious injury, including death, to:

(i) Any person; or

(ii) Any real or personal property; or

(b) Failure to have any or adequate insurance coverage, even if liability under (a) or (b) of this subsection is imposed on the surety's principal or the surety by contract, surety bond, strict liability, ordinance, statute, or common law.

[ 1992 c 115 s 1.]